Utah statutes.
26-49-202.   Volunteer health practitioner registration systems.

(1)  To qualify as a volunteer health practitioner registration system, the registration system shall:

(a)  accept applications for the registration of volunteer health practitioners before or during an emergency;

(b)  include information about the licensure and good standing of health practitioners that is accessible by authorized persons;

(c)  be capable of confirming the accuracy of information concerning whether a health practitioner is licensed and in good standing before health services or veterinary services are provided under this chapter; and

(d)  meet one of the following conditions:

(i)  be an emergency system for advance registration of volunteer health practitioners established by a state and funded through the United States Department of Health and Human Services under Section 319I of the Public Health Services Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 247d-7b, as amended;

(ii)  be a local unit consisting of trained and equipped emergency response, public health, and medical personnel formed under Section 2801 of the Public Health Services Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300hh as amended;

(iii)  be operated by a:

(A)  disaster relief organization;

(B)  licensing board;

(C)  national or regional association of licensing boards or health practitioners;

(D)  health facility that provides comprehensive inpatient and outpatient healthcare services, including tertiary care; or

(E)  governmental entity; or

(iv)  be designated by the Department of Health as a registration system for purposes of this chapter.

(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), while an emergency declaration is in effect, the Department of Health, a person authorized to act on behalf of the Department of Health, or a host entity shall confirm whether a volunteer health practitioner in Utah is registered with a registration system that complies with Subsection (1).

(b)  The confirmation authorized under this Subsection (2) is limited to obtaining the identity of the practitioner from the system and determining whether the system indicates that the practitioner is licensed and in good standing.

(3)  Upon request of a person authorized under Subsection (2), or a similarly authorized person in another state, a registration system located in Utah shall notify the person of the identity of a volunteer health practitioner and whether or not the volunteer health practitioner is licensed and in good standing.

(4)  A host entity is not required to use the services of a volunteer health practitioner even if the volunteer health practitioner is registered with a registration system that indicates that the practitioner is licensed and in good standing.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

